Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SILVER BAY TRAILHEAD.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Silver Bay for construction of the Silver Bay Trailhead. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REDHEAD MOUNTAIN BIKE PARK.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Chisolm for trail development, maintenance, and related amenities at Redhead Mountain Bike Park. new text end